Hawaii, session 2025, SB144.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 442-2, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§442-2  License to practice.  (a)  It shall be unlawful for any person to practice chiropractic without a license.  Any person applying for a license to practice chiropractic shall submit an application to the Hawaii board of chiropractic accompanied by the application fee, and all documents and affidavits that may be prescribed by law. The application shall be submitted in accordance with the rules of the board, shall be on a form prescribed by the board, and shall be signed by the applicant.  In addition thereto, each applicant shall furnish to the board: (1)  Satisfactory proof that the applicant has met the educational requirements prescribed in the rules of the board; provided that these educational requirements shall not apply to applicants having entered an approved chiropractic college on or before October 31, 1955; and (2)  Satisfactory proof that the applicant graduated from a chiropractic college accredited by, or recognized as a candidate for accreditation by, any chiropractic college accrediting agency recognized by the United States Department of Education; provided that the requirements shall not apply to applicants who matriculated in any chiropractic college prior to October 15, 1984. (b) Except in the cases otherwise prescribed in this section each applicant shall be a graduate of a chiropractic school or college accredited as provided by this section. (c) Each applicant who successfully passes the examination shall pay a license fee. (d) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a student enrolled in a qualified chiropractic college from engaging in clinical practice under the direct supervision of a qualified licensed chiropractor as part of the student's educational program." SECTION 2. The Hawaii board of chiropractic shall adopt rules defining "clinical practice" and establishing the criteria to qualify as a chiropractic college or direct supervising licensed chiropractor pursuant to this Act. SECTION 3. New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval; provided that section 1 shall take effect on July 1, 2027.